src/main/resources/plurals.aff
SFX A Y 8
SFX A   0         и         .
SFX A   0         ите       .

SFX B Y 3
SFX B   0         и         .
SFX B   0         ите       .

SFX C Y 4
SFX C   0         и         .
SFX C   0         ите       .

SFX D Y 4
SFX D   0         ове       .
SFX D   0         овете     .

SFX E Y 5
SFX E   0         и         .
SFX E   0         ите       .

SFX F Y 5
SFX F   0         и         .
SFX F   0         ите       .

SFX G Y 5
SFX G   0         и         .
SFX G   0         ите       .

SFX H Y 4
SFX H   0         и         .
SFX H   0         ите       .

SFX I Y 0

SFX J Y 3
SFX J   0         та        .
SFX J   0         тата      .

SFX K Y 25
SFX K   а         и         .
SFX K   а         ите       .
SFX K   г         зи        .
SFX K   г         зите      .
SFX K   ен        ни        .
SFX K   ен        ните      .
SFX K   и         ите       .
SFX K   я         и         .
SFX K   я         ите       .

SFX L Y 133
SFX L   а         и         .
SFX L   а         ите       .
SFX L   ен        йни       .
SFX L   ен        йните     .
SFX L   ец        ци        .
SFX L   ец        ците      .
SFX L   е         я         .
SFX L   е         ята       .
SFX L   и         ите       .
SFX L   о         а         .
SFX L   о         ата       .
SFX L   ъв        ви        .
SFX L   ъв        вите      .
SFX L   ъг        ги        .
SFX L   ъг        гите      .
SFX L   ък        ки        .
SFX L   ък        ките      .
SFX L   ъл        ли        .
SFX L   ъл        лите      .
SFX L   ър        ри        .
SFX L   ър        рите      .
SFX L   ъш        ши        .
SFX L   ъш        шите      .
SFX L   яв        еви       .
SFX L   яв        евите     .
SFX L   як        еки       .
SFX L   як        еките     .
SFX L   ял        ели       .
SFX L   ял        елите     .
SFX L   ям        еми       .
SFX L   ям        емите     .
SFX L   ян        ени       .
SFX L   ян        ените     .
SFX L   яп        епи       .
SFX L   яп        епите     .
SFX L   ят        ети       .
SFX L   ят        етите     .

SFX M Y 29
SFX M   е         а         .
SFX M   е         ата       .
SFX M   ец        йци       .
SFX M   ец        йците     .
SFX M   ин        и         .
SFX M   ин        ите       .
SFX M   й         и         .
SFX M   й         ите       .
SFX M   о         и         .
SFX M   о         ите       .
SFX M   ъм        ми        .
SFX M   ъм        мите      .
SFX M   я         и         .
SFX M   я         ите       .

SFX N Y 20
SFX N   ел        ли        .
SFX N   ел        лите      .
SFX N   ец        ци        .
SFX N   ец        ците      .
SFX N   ъл        ли        .
SFX N   ъл        лите      .
SFX N   ъм        ми        .
SFX N   ъм        мите      .
SFX N   ър        ри        .
SFX N   ър        рите      .

SFX O Y 18
SFX O   е         ия        .
SFX O   е         ията      .
SFX O   й         и         .
SFX O   й         ите       .
SFX O   к         ци        .
SFX O   к         ците      .
SFX O   о         овци      .
SFX O   о         овците    .
SFX O   х         си        .
SFX O   х         сите      .

SFX P Y 104
SFX P   а         ат        .
SFX P   а         ели       .
SFX P   а         елите     .
SFX P   а         ени       .
SFX P   а         ените     .
SFX P   а         еха       .
SFX P   а         ещи       .
SFX P   а         ещите     .
SFX P   а         илата     .
SFX P   а         или       .
SFX P   а         илите     .
SFX P   а         иха       .
SFX P   я         ели       .
SFX P   я         елите     .
SFX P   я         ени       .
SFX P   я         ените     .
SFX P   я         еха       .
SFX P   я         ещи       .
SFX P   я         ещите     .
SFX P   я         или       .
SFX P   я         илите     .
SFX P   я         иха       .
SFX P   я         ят        .

SFX Q Y 93
SFX Q   а         али       .
SFX Q   а         алите     .
SFX Q   а         ати       .
SFX Q   а         атите     .
SFX Q   а         аха       .
SFX Q   а         ели       .
SFX Q   а         елите     .
SFX Q   а         еха       .
SFX Q   я         ели       .
SFX Q   я         елите     .
SFX Q   я         ени       .
SFX Q   я         ените     .
SFX Q   я         еше       .
SFX Q   я         или       .
SFX Q   я         илите     .
SFX Q   я         иха       .
SFX Q   я         ят        .
SFX Q   я         яха       .
SFX Q   я         ящи       .
SFX Q   я         ящите     .

SFX R Y 160
SFX R   ера       ерат      .
SFX R   ера       ерели     .
SFX R   ера       ерелите   .
SFX R   ера       ерещи     .
SFX R   ера       ерещите   .
SFX R   ера       еряха     .
SFX R   ера       рали      .
SFX R   ера       ралите    .
SFX R   ера       рани      .
SFX R   ера       раните    .
SFX R   ера       раха      .
SFX R   ея        еели      .
SFX R   ея        еелите    .
SFX R   ея        ееха      .
SFX R   ея        еещи      .
SFX R   ея        еещите    .
SFX R   ея        ели       .
SFX R   ея        елите     .
SFX R   ея        ени       .
SFX R   ея        ените     .
SFX R   ея        яха       .
SFX R   ша        сали      .
SFX R   ша        салите    .
SFX R   ша        сани      .
SFX R   ша        саните    .
SFX R   ша        саха      .
SFX R   ша        шат       .
SFX R   ша        шели      .
SFX R   ша        шелите    .
SFX R   ша        шеха      .
SFX R   ша        шещи      .
SFX R   ша        шещите    .

SFX S Y 81
SFX S   ам        айте      .
SFX S   ам        али       .
SFX S   ам        алите     .
SFX S   ам        аме       .
SFX S   ам        ани       .
SFX S   ам        аните     .
SFX S   ам        ат        .
SFX S   ам        ате       .
SFX S   ам        аха       .
SFX S   ам        ахме      .
SFX S   ам        ахте      .
SFX S   ам        ащи       .
SFX S   ам        ащите     .
SFX S   я         ели       .
SFX S   я         елите     .
SFX S   я         ени       .
SFX S   я         ените     .
SFX S   я         ете       .
SFX S   я         им        .
SFX S   я         ите       .
SFX S   я         ят        .
SFX S   я         яха       .
SFX S   я         яхме      .
SFX S   я         яхте      .
SFX S   я         ящи       .
SFX S   я         ящите     .

SFX T Y 94
SFX T   я         ели       .
SFX T   я         елите     .
SFX T   я         ем        .
SFX T   я         ете       .
SFX T   я         еха       .
SFX T   я         ехме      .
SFX T   я         ехте      .
SFX T   я         ещи       .
SFX T   я         ещите     .
SFX T   я         йте       .
SFX T   я         ли        .
SFX T   я         лите      .
SFX T   ям        яйте      .
SFX T   ям        яли       .
SFX T   ям        ялите     .
SFX T   ям        яни       .
SFX T   ям        яните     .
SFX T   ям        яха       .
SFX T   ям        ящи       .
SFX T   ям        ящите     .
SFX T   я         ти        .
SFX T   я         тите      .
SFX T   я         ха        .
SFX T   я         ят        .

SFX U Y 184
SFX U   да        дат       .
SFX U   да        дели      .
SFX U   да        делите    .
SFX U   да        дени      .
SFX U   да        дените    .
SFX U   да        доха      .
SFX U   да        дяха      .
SFX U   да        дящи      .
SFX U   да        дящите    .
SFX U   да        ли        .
SFX U   да        лите      .
SFX U   та        ли        .
SFX U   та        лите      .
SFX U   та        тат       .
SFX U   та        тели      .
SFX U   та        телите    .
SFX U   та        тени      .
SFX U   та        тените    .
SFX U   та        тения     .
SFX U   та        теният    .
SFX U   та        тоха      .
SFX U   та        тяха      .
SFX U   та        тящи      .
SFX U   та        тящите    .
SFX U   я         ели       .
SFX U   я         елите     .
SFX U   я         еха       .
SFX U   я         ещи       .
SFX U   я         ещите     .
SFX U   я         ли        .
SFX U   я         лите      .
SFX U   я         ни        .
SFX U   я         ните      .
SFX U   я         ха        .
SFX U   я         ят        .
SFX U   дя        дят       .
SFX U   дя        дяха      .
SFX U   дя        деха      .
SFX U   дя        деше      .

SFX V Y 96
SFX V   да        шли       .
SFX V   да        шлите     .
SFX V   га        гат       .
SFX V   га        гли       .
SFX V   га        глите     .
SFX V   га        жаха      .
SFX V   га        жели      .
SFX V   га        желите    .
SFX V   га        жеха      .
SFX V   га        жещи      .
SFX V   га        жещите    .
SFX V   а         али       .
SFX V   а         алите     .
SFX V   а         ат        .
SFX V   а         аха       .
SFX V   а         ащи       .
SFX V   а         ащите     .
SFX V   а         ели       .
SFX V   а         елите     .
SFX V   а         еха       .
SFX V   я         ели       .
SFX V   я         елите     .
SFX V   я         ени       .
SFX V   я         ените     .
SFX V   я         или       .
SFX V   я         илите     .
SFX V   я         иха       .
SFX V   я         ят        .
SFX V   я         ящи       .
SFX V   я         ящите     .

SFX W Y 97
SFX W   ея        еели      .
SFX W   ея        еелите    .
SFX W   ея        ееха      .
SFX W   ея        еещи      .
SFX W   ея        еещите    .
SFX W   ея        ели       .
SFX W   ея        елите     .
SFX W   ея        ети       .
SFX W   ея        етите     .
SFX W   ея        еят       .
SFX W   ея        ях        .
SFX W   ея        яха       .
SFX W   жа        жат       .
SFX W   жа        жели      .
SFX W   жа        желите    .
SFX W   жа        жеха      .
SFX W   жа        зали      .
SFX W   жа        залите    .
SFX W   жа        зани      .
SFX W   жа        заните    .
SFX W   жа        заха      .

SFX X Y 148
SFX X   а         али       .
SFX X   а         алите     .
SFX X   а         ани       .
SFX X   а         аните     .
SFX X   а         ат        .
SFX X   а         аха       .
SFX X   а         ели       .
SFX X   а         елите     .
SFX X   а         ещи       .
SFX X   а         ещите     .
SFX X   а         яха       .
SFX X   м         дат       .
SFX X   м         дели      .
SFX X   м         делите    .
SFX X   м         дени      .
SFX X   м         дените    .
SFX X   м         доха      .
SFX X   м         дяха      .
SFX X   м         ли        .
SFX X   м         лите      .
SFX X   я         али       .
SFX X   я         алите     .
SFX X   я         ани       .
SFX X   я         аните     .
SFX X   я         аха       .
SFX X   я         ели       .
SFX X   я         елите     .
SFX X   я         еха       .
SFX X   я         ещи       .
SFX X   я         ещите     .
SFX X   я         ят        .

SFX Y Y 200
SFX Y   аса       асат      .
SFX Y   аса       асели     .
SFX Y   аса       аселите   .
SFX Y   аса       асени     .
SFX Y   аса       асените   .
SFX Y   аса       асли      .
SFX Y   аса       аслите    .
SFX Y   аса       асоха     .
SFX Y   аса       асяха     .
SFX Y   аса       асящи     .
SFX Y   аса       асящите   .
SFX Y   еса       есат      .
SFX Y   еса       есели     .
SFX Y   еса       еселите   .
SFX Y   еса       есени     .
SFX Y   еса       есените   .
SFX Y   еса       если      .
SFX Y   еса       еслите    .
SFX Y   еса       есоха     .
SFX Y   еса       есяха     .
SFX Y   еса       есящи     .
SFX Y   еса       есящите   .
SFX Y   ка        кат       .
SFX Y   ка        кли       .
SFX Y   ка        клите     .
SFX Y   ка        коха      .
SFX Y   ка        чащи      .
SFX Y   ка        чащите    .
SFX Y   ка        чели      .
SFX Y   ка        челите    .
SFX Y   ка        чени      .
SFX Y   ка        чените    .
SFX Y   ка        чеха      .
SFX Y   ча        кали      .
SFX Y   ча        калите    .
SFX Y   ча        каха      .
SFX Y   ча        чат       .
SFX Y   ча        чели      .
SFX Y   ча        челите    .
SFX Y   ча        чеха      .
SFX Y   ча        чещи      .
SFX Y   ча        чещите    .
